Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Environmental Self-Evaluation Reports

§ 49-2-71.
Discovery and admissibility in evidence of environmental self-evaluation reports; divulgence or dissemination of information in reports; exemption from Public Records Act.

An environmental self-evaluation report, as defined in Section 49-2-2, is privileged and is not admissible in any legal or investigative action in any civil or administrative proceeding and is not subject to any discovery pursuant to the rules of civil procedure or administrative procedure, unless:

The person for whom the environmental self-evaluation report was prepared, irrespective of whether the self-evaluation report was conducted and/or prepared by a private contractor hired by the person, expressly waives the provisions of this section;

The court of record, or hearing officer, who shall be neutral and independent, after in camera review, determines that:

The environmental self-evaluation report shows evidence that the person for which the environmental self-evaluation report was prepared is not or was not in compliance with an environmental law;

The person did not initiate appropriate efforts to achieve compliance with the environmental law or complete any necessary permit application promptly after the noncompliance with the environmental law was discovered and, as a result, the person did not or will not achieve compliance with the environmental law or complete the necessary permit application within a reasonable amount of time;

For the purposes of paragraphs (b)(i) and (b)(ii) only, if the evidence shows noncompliance by a person with more than one (1) environmental law, the person may demonstrate that appropriate efforts to achieve compliance were or are being taken by instituting a comprehensive program that establishes a phased schedule of actions to be taken to bring the person into compliance with all of such environmental laws;

The court of record or hearing officer, who shall be neutral and independent, after an in camera review, determines that the privilege is being asserted for a fraudulent purpose or that the environmental self-evaluation report was prepared to avoid disclosure of information in an investigative, administrative, or judicial proceeding that was underway, or for which the person had been provided written notification that an investigation into a specific violation had been initiated; or

For environmental self-evaluation reports made before January 20, 2003, the court of record or hearing officer, who shall be neutral and independent, determines that even if subject to the privilege, it is found that a condition exists that demonstrates an imminent and substantial hazard or endangerment to the public health and safety or the environment;

For an environmental self-evaluation report that was made on or after January 20, 2003, the court of record or hearing officer, who shall be neutral and independent, determines that even if subject to the privilege, it is found that a condition exists or existed at the time of the report that demonstrates or demonstrated an imminent and substantial hazard or endangerment to the public health and safety or the environment.

The self-evaluation privilege created by this section does not apply to:

Documents or information required to be developed, maintained or reported pursuant to any environmental law or any other law or regulation; or

Documents or other information required to be made available or furnished to a regulatory agency pursuant to any environmental law or any other law or regulation; or

Information in the possession of a regulatory agency obtained through observation, sampling, monitoring or otherwise and which is subject to public disclosure pursuant to the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983; or

Information obtained through any source independent of the environmental self-evaluation report; or

Documents existing prior to the commencement of and independent of the voluntary self-evaluation with the exception of evidence establishing a request for compliance assistance to the appropriate government agency or authority.

Upon a showing by any party, based upon independent knowledge, that probable cause exists to believe that an exception to the self-evaluation privilege under subsection (1) of this section is applicable to an environmental self-evaluation report or that the privilege does not apply to the environmental self-evaluation report pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, then a court of record or hearing officer, who shall be neutral and independent, may allow such party limited access to the environmental self-evaluation report for the purposes of an in camera review only. The court of record or the hearing officer may grant limited access to all or part of the environmental self-evaluation report under the provisions of this subsection (3) upon such conditions as may be necessary to protect the confidentiality of the environmental self-evaluation report. A moving party who obtains access to an environmental self-evaluation report pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (3) may not divulge any information from the report except as specifically allowed by the court or hearing officer.

If any party divulges all or any part of the information contained in an environmental self-evaluation report in violation of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) or if any other person knowingly divulges or disseminates all or any part of the information contained in an environmental self-evaluation report that was provided to such person in violation of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), such party or other person is liable for any damages caused by the divulgence or dissemination of the information that are incurred by the person for which the environmental self-evaluation report was prepared. The court or hearing officer also may issue such contempt orders and sanctions against the offending party or such party’s legal counsel as may be necessary to ensure compliance.

Nothing in this section limits, waives or abrogates the scope or nature of any statutory or common-law privilege.

A person asserting a voluntary self-evaluation privilege has the burden of proving a prima facie case as to the privilege. A party seeking disclosure of an environmental self-evaluation report has the burden of proving that such privilege does not exist under this section.

All environmental self-evaluation reports that are protected by the self-evaluation privilege created by this section shall be privileged and exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act in accordance with Section 25-61-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 301, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Jan. 20, 2003.).